Wisconsin, session 2025, AB154.
do enact as follows:AB154,11Section 1. 94.36 (1) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB154,2,2294.36 (1) (title) Prohibition; waiver.AB154,23Section 2. 94.36 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 94.36 (1) and amended 4to read:AB154,2,8594.36 (1) Except as provided in par. (b), sub. (1m), no person may plant 5 or 6more acres of potatoes in this state in a calendar year unless all of the seed potatoes 7that will be used for planting in this state by the person are certified under ch. 8ATCP 156, Wis. Adm. Code.AB154,31Section 3. 94.36 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 94.36 (1m) and 2amended to read:AB154,3,11394.36 (1m) Waiver. The department, upon the request of one or more 4growers, may waive the prohibition under par. (a) sub. (1) for seed potatoes of a 5specific variety or genotype for a growing season if there are not enough certified 6seed potatoes of that variety or genotype reasonably available to growers during 7that calendar year and the department determines that the seed potatoes of that 8variety or genotype that will be used for planting do not pose a serious disease 9threat. The department may include as a condition of a waiver provided under this 10subsection restrictions as to permissible geographic boundaries or geographic 11limitations where a person may plant the waived seed potatoes.AB154,412Section 4. 94.36 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB154,3,201394.36 (2m) enforcement. (a) 1. If the department finds a violation of sub. 14(1) or a condition of a waiver made under sub. (1m), the department may issue an 15order directing the violator to remove and destroy any seed potatoes and potatoes 16involved in the violation, and the violator shall cause the removal and destruction 17as so ordered within 72 hours after the order is issued in the manner directed in the 18order. The department may extend the 72-hour period for compliance under this 19paragraph if it determines that the removal and destruction cannot be completed 20within that time.AB154,3,24212. No person may violate the terms of any order given under subd. 1., nor may 22any damages be awarded to a person who plants potatoes in violation of sub. (1) or 23in violation of a condition of a waiver made under sub. (1m) for any removal or 24destruction completed as a result of an order given under subd. 1.AB154,4,1013. If a person fails to comply with the terms of an order within the time period 2as required or extended under subd. 1., the department or any cooperating local 3unit of government may proceed to remove and destroy any seed potatoes or 4potatoes involved in the violation as ordered by the department. The expense of 5action taken under this subdivision shall be certified to the clerk of the applicable 6local unit of government, and shall be thereafter assessed, collected, and enforced 7against the person as taxes for the person are assessed, collected, and enforced and 8paid to the cooperating local unit of government that incurred the expense, or paid 9into the general fund if the removal and destruction was conducted by the 10department.AB154,4,1511(b) Orders issued under par. (a) shall have the force and effect of an order 12under s. 93.18, and are subject to the right of hearing before the department if 13requested within 10 days after the date of service of the order. Any party affected 14by the order may request a preliminary or informal hearing pending the scheduling 15and conduct of a full hearing.AB154,516Section 5. 94.36 (3) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB154,4,221794.36 (3) Penalties. (a) Except as provided in par. (b), a person who plants 18potatoes in violation of sub. (1) in a calendar year, who violates a condition of a 19waiver made under sub. (1m), or who fails to retain, allow inspection of, or provide 20copies of records in violation of sub. (2) in a calendar year shall forfeit not more than 21$5,000, plus not more than $5,000 for each full acre planted in violation of sub. (1) 22or (1m).AB154,5,223(b) The department may waive a forfeiture required under par. (a) for a 24violation of sub. (1) or (1m) if the department determines that all seed potatoes and 1potatoes involved in the violation were removed and destroyed in compliance with 2an order issued under sub. (2m) (a) 1.AB154,5,33